Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-10,111
Costs; liability.

(1) All costs associated with treating, seizing, or
destroying any plant or issuing and enforcing any withdrawal-from-distribution
order for any plant, which plant is in violation of the Plant Protection and
Plant Pest Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant
to the act, shall be the responsibility of the person in possession of the
plant. The department shall be reimbursed by the person in possession of the
plant for the actual cost incurred by the department in enforcing the act
or such rules and regulations.

(2) All costs related to enforcement of the act and
such rules and regulations shall be the responsibility of the person violating
the act. The department shall be reimbursed by persons violating the act or
such rules and regulations for the actual cost incurred by the department
in enforcing the act.

(3)
The department shall not be liable for any costs incurred by any person due
to any departmental actions relating to the enforcement of the act or such
rules and regulations.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 40;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 20.